Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.150

Official stamp.

(1) It is unlawful for any person intentionally to manufacture, give, sell, procure, or possess a seal or stamp evidencing the current appointment of a person as a notary public until the director has issued a notary commission. The official seal or stamp of a notary public must include:

(a) The words "notary public";

(b) The words "state of Washington";

(c) The notary public's name as commissioned;

(d) The notary public's commission expiration date; and

(e) Any other information required by the director.

(2) The size and form or forms of the seal or stamp shall be prescribed by the director in rule.

(3) The seal or stamp must be capable of being copied together with the record to which it is affixed or attached or with which it is logically associated.

(4) The seal or stamp used at the time that a notarial act is performed must be the seal or stamp evidencing the notary public's commission in effect as of such time, even if the notary public has received the seal or stamp evidencing his or her next commission.

[ 2017 c 281 s 17.]